District of Columbia statutes.
42-1003

Special power.

A power is special:

(1)

Where the persons or class of persons to whom the disposition of the lands under the power is to be made is designated;

(2)

Where the power authorizes the alienation, by means of a conveyance, will, or charge, of a particular estate or interest less than a fee.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1353, ch. 854, § 1039
1981 Ed., § 45-103.
1973 Ed., § 45-1003.